Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 3 Membership

47-25-40.
Qualifications.

Before any person shall be eligible to participate in the fund, he or she must be serving as a duly qualified and commissioned chief magistrate of a county of the State of Georgia or as the secretary-treasurer. Any qualified person who desires to participate in the fund shall make application to the board for membership in the fund on a form to be furnished by the board for that purpose, giving such information, together with verification and proof thereof, as may be required by the board. Such application shall be made not later than July 1, 2007, or within six months after becoming eligible for membership, whichever is later.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 835, § 4/HB 646.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, deleted “full-time” preceding “chief magistrate” in the first sentence.

47-25-41.
Member dues.

Each member shall pay into the fund as dues a sum equal to 3.42 percent of the member’s maximum average final monthly compensation established by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-25-81 per month. Each month’s dues shall be paid not later than the tenth day of that month.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2006, p. 246, § 1/SB 244; Ga. L. 2014, p. 701, § 2/HB 292.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “a sum equal to 3.42 percent of the member’s maximum average final monthly compensation established by subsection (a) of Code Section 47-25-81” for “the sum of $105.00” in the first sentence.

47-25-42.
Calculation of dues and benefits for certain members.

No compensation used to calculate a retirement benefit under the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund of Georgia shall be used to calculate member dues or retirement benefits under this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-42

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 701, § 3/HB 292.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2014.

47-25-43.
Suspension for failure to pay dues; application for reinstatement.

A member who is in arrears for the dues payment required by Code Section 47-25-41 for a period of 90 days shall become a suspended member on the ninetieth day of such arrearage.

A suspended member may apply for reinstatement as an active member only during the 30 day period beginning with his or her next full term of office, and such member shall not receive service credit for the period of time during which he or she was a suspended member.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-25-43

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 196, § 1/HB 571.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.